Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1356
Stay of enforcement of judgment pending determination of motion.

A person that files a motion under subsection (a) of section 25-1355 to vacate registration of a Canadian judgment may request the court to stay enforcement of the judgment pending determination of the motion. The court shall grant the stay if the person establishes a likelihood of success on the merits with regard to a ground listed in subsection (b) of section 25-1355 for vacating a registration. The court may require the person to provide security in an amount determined by the court as a condition of granting the stay.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 20.